North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 16. Public Enterprises.
§ 160A-324.
Contract with private solid waste collection firm(s).

If the area to be annexed described in an act of the General Assembly includes an area where a firm (i) meets the requirements of subsection (a1) of this section, (ii) on the ninetieth day preceding the date of introduction in the House of Representatives or the Senate of the bill which became the act making the annexation, was providing solid waste collection services in the area to be annexed, (iii) is still providing such services on the date the act becomes law, and (iv) by reason of the annexation the firm’s franchise with a county or arrangements with third parties for solid waste collection will be terminated, the city shall do one of the following:

Contract with the firm for a period of two years after the effective date of the annexation ordinance to allow the firm to provide collection services to the city in the area to be annexed for sums determined under subsection (d) of this section.

Pay the firm for the firm’s economic loss, with one-third of the economic loss to be paid within 30 days of the termination and the balance paid in 12 equal monthly installments during the next succeeding 12 months. Any remaining economic loss payment is forfeited if the firm terminates service to customers in the annexation area prior to the effective date of the annexation.

Make other arrangements satisfactory to the parties.

(a1)

To qualify for the options set forth in subsection (a) of this section, a firm must have, subsequent to receiving notice of the annexation in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, filed with the city clerk at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the annexation a written request to contract with the city to provide solid waste collection services containing a certification, signed by an officer or owner of the firm, that the firm serves at least 50 customers within the county at that time.

(a2)

Firms shall file notice of provision of solid waste collection service with the city clerk of all cities located in the firm’s collection area or within five miles thereof.

The city shall make a good faith effort to provide at least 30 days before the effective date of the annexation a copy of the act to each private firm providing solid waste collection services in the area to be annexed. The notice shall be sent to all firms that filed notice in accordance with subsection (a2) of this section by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address provided by the firm under subsection (a2) of this section.

The city may require that the contract contain:

A requirement that the firm post a performance bond and maintain public liability insurance coverage;

A requirement that the firm agree to service customers in the annexed area that were not served by that firm on the effective date of annexation;

A provision that divides the annexed area into service areas if there were more than one firm being contracted within the area, such that the entire area is served by the firms, or by the city as to customers not served by the firms;

A provision that the city may serve customers not served by the firm on the effective date of annexation;

A provision that the contract can be cancelled in writing, delivered by certified mail to the firm in question with 30 days to cure, substantial violations of the contract, but no contract may be cancelled on these grounds unless the Local Government Commission finds that substantial violations have occurred, except that the city may suspend the contract for up to 30 days if it finds substantial violation of health laws;

Performance standards, not exceeding city standards existing at the time of notice provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, with provision that the contract may be cancelled for substantial violations of those standards, but no contract may be cancelled on those grounds unless the Local Government Commission finds that substantial violations have occurred;

A provision for monetary damages if there are violations of the contract or of performance standards.

If the services to be provided to the city by reason of the annexation are substantially the same as rendered under the franchise with the county or arrangements with the parties, the amount paid by the city shall be at least ninety percent (90%) of the amount paid or required under the existing franchise or arrangements. If such services are required to be adjusted to conform to city standards or as a result of changes in the number of customers and as a result there are changes in disposal costs (including mileage and landfill charges), requirements for storage capacity (dumpsters and/or residential carts), and/or frequency of collection, the amount paid by the city for the service shall be increased or decreased to reflect the value of such adjusted services as if computed under the existing franchise or arrangements. In the event agreement cannot be reached between the city and the firm under this subsection, the matters shall be determined by the Local Government Commission.

, (f) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-193, s. 1, applicable to annexations for which the bill making the annexation is enacted on or after January 1, 2007.

(g)

If the city fails to offer a contract to the firm within 30 days following the effective date of the annexation act, the firm may appeal within 60 days following the effective date of the annexation act to the Local Government Commission for an order directing the city to offer a contract. If the Local Government Commission finds that the city has not made an offer which complies with this section, it shall order the city to pay to the firm a civil penalty of the amount of payments it finds that the city would have had to make under the contract, during the noncompliance period until the contract offer is made. Either the firm or the city may obtain judicial review in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

(h)

A firm which has given notice under subsection (a) of this section that it desires to contract, and any firm that the city believes is eligible to give such notice, shall make available to the city not later than 30 days following a written request of the city all information in its possession or control, including but not limited to operational, financial and budgetary information, necessary for the city to determine if the firm qualifies for the benefits of this section and to determine the nature and scope of the potential contract and/or economic loss. The firm forfeits its rights under this section if it fails to make a good faith response within 30 days following receipt of the written request for information from the city, provided that the city’s written request so states by specific reference to this section.

(i)

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

Economic loss. — A sum equal to 15 times the average gross monthly revenue for the three months prior to the introduction of the bill under subsection (a) of this section, collected or due the firm for residential, commercial, and industrial collection service in the area annexed or to be annexed; provided that revenues shall be included in calculations under this subdivision only if policies of the city will provide solid waste collection to those customers such that arrangements between the firm and the customers will be terminated.

Firm. — A private solid waste collection firm.

History.

1989, c. 598, s. 1; 2006-193, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-193, s. 3, effective August 3, 2006, and applicable to annexations for which the bill making the annexation is enacted on or after January 1, 2007, rewrote subsection (a); added subsections (a1), (a2) and (i); added the last sentence in subsection (b); deleted “private” preceding “firm” and “firms” throughout subsections (c), (d) and (g); substituted “in writing, delivered by certified mail to the firm in question with 30 days to cure” for “for” in subdivision (c)(5); inserted “existing at the time of notice provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section” in subdivision (c)(6); substituted “the” for “such” near the end of subsection (d); deleted subsections (e) and (f); and, in subsection (h), substituted “30 days” for “five days” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

§ 160A-325.
Selection or approval of sites for certain sanitary landfills; solid waste defined.

The governing board of a city shall consider alternative sites and socioeconomic and demographic data and shall hold a public hearing prior to selecting or approving a site for a new sanitary landfill that receives residential solid waste that is located within one mile of an existing sanitary landfill within the State. The distance between an existing and a proposed site shall be determined by measurement between the closest points on the outer boundary of each site. The definitions set out in

G.S. 130A-290

apply to this subsection. As used in this subsection:

“Approving a site” refers to prior approval of a site under G.S. 130A-294(a)(4).

“Existing sanitary landfill” means a sanitary landfill that is in operation or that has been in operation within the five-year period immediately prior to the date on which an application for a permit is submitted.

“New sanitary landfill” means a sanitary landfill that includes areas not within the legal description of an existing sanitary landfill as set out in the permit for the existing sanitary landfill.

“Socioeconomic and demographic data” means the most recent socioeconomic and demographic data compiled by the United States Bureau of the Census and any additional socioeconomic and demographic data submitted at the public hearing.

As used in this Part, “solid waste” means nonhazardous solid waste, that is, solid waste as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

but not including hazardous waste.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1013, s. 3.

§ 160A-326.
Limitations on rail transportation liability.

As used in this section:

“Claim” means a claim, action, suit, or request for damages, whether compensatory, punitive, or otherwise, made by any person or entity against:

The City, a railroad, or an operating rights railroad; or

An officer, director, trustee, employee, parent, subsidiary, or affiliated corporation as defined in

G.S. 105-130.2

, or agent of: the City, a railroad, or an operating rights railroad.

“Operating rights railroad” means a railroad corporation or railroad company that, prior to January 1, 2001, was granted operating rights by a State-Owned Railroad Company or operated over the property of a State-Owned Railroad Company under a claim of right over or adjacent to facilities used by or on behalf of the City.

“Passenger rail services” means the transportation of rail passengers by or on behalf of the City and all services performed by a railroad pursuant to a contract with the City in connection with the transportation of rail passengers, including, but not limited to, the operation of trains; the use of right-of-way, trackage, public or private roadway and rail crossings, equipment, or station areas or appurtenant facilities; the design, construction, reconstruction, operation, or maintenance of rail-related equipment, tracks, and any appurtenant facilities; or the provision of access rights over or adjacent to lines owned by the City or a railroad, or otherwise occupied by the City or a railroad, pursuant to charter grant, fee-simple deed, lease, easement, license, trackage rights, or other form of ownership or authorized use.

“Railroad” means a railroad corporation or railroad company, including a State-Owned Railroad Company as defined in G.S. 124-11, that has entered into any contracts or operating agreements of any kind with the City concerning passenger rail services.

Contracts Allocating Financial Responsibility Authorized. — The City may contract with any railroad to allocate financial responsibility for passenger rail services claims, including, but not limited to, the execution of indemnity agreements, notwithstanding any other statutory, common law, public policy, or other prohibition against same, and regardless of the nature of the claim or the conduct giving rise to such claim.

Insurance Required. —

If the City enters into any contract authorized by subsection (b) of this section, the contract shall require the City to secure and maintain, upon and after the commencement of the operation of trains by or on behalf of the City, a liability insurance policy covering the liability of the parties to the contract, a State-Owned Railroad Company as defined in G.S. 124-11 that owns or claims an interest in any real property subject to the contract, and any operating rights railroad for all claims for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, and death arising out of or related to passenger rail services. The policy shall name the parties to the contract, a State-Owned Railroad Company as defined in G.S. 124-11 that owns or claims an interest in any real property subject to the contract, and any operating rights railroad as named insureds and shall have policy limits of not less than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) per single accident or incident, and may include a self-insured retention in an amount of not more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

If the City does not enter into any contract authorized by subsection (b) of this section, upon and after the commencement of the operation of trains by or on behalf of the City, the City shall secure and maintain a liability insurance policy, with policy limits and a self-insured retention consistent with subdivision (1) of this subsection, for all claims for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, and death arising out of or related to passenger rail services.

Liability Limit. — The aggregate liability of the City, the parties to the contract or contracts authorized by subsection (b) of this section, a State-Owned Railroad Company as defined in G.S. 124-11, and any operating rights railroad for all claims arising from a single accident or incident related to passenger rail services for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, and death is limited to two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) per single accident or incident or to any proceeds available under any insurance policy secured pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, whichever is greater.

Effect on Other Laws. — This section shall not affect the damages that may be recovered under the Federal Employers’ Liability Act, 45 U.S.C. § 51, et seq., (1908); or under Article 1 of Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.

Applicability. — This section shall apply only to municipalities with a population of more than 500,000 persons, according to the latest decennial census, or to municipalities that have entered into a transit governance interlocal agreement with, among other local governments, a city with a population of more than 500,000 persons.

History.

2002-78, s. 3; 2012-79, s. 1.14(f).

§ 160A-327.
Displacement of private solid waste collection services.

A unit of local government shall not displace a private company that is providing collection services for municipal solid waste or recovered materials, or both, except as provided for in this section.

Before a local government may displace a private company that is providing collection services for municipal solid waste or recovered materials, or both, the unit of local government shall publish notice of the first meeting where the proposed change in solid waste collection service will be discussed. Notice shall be published once a week for at least four consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the unit of local government and the proposed displacement area are located. The first public notice shall be given no less than 30 days but no more than 60 days prior to the displacement issue being placed on the agenda for discussion or action at an official meeting of the governing body of the unit of local government. The notice shall specify the date and place of the meeting, the geographic location in which solid waste collection services are proposed to be changed, and the types of solid waste collection services that may be affected. In addition, the unit of local government shall send written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to all companies that have filed notice with the unit of local government clerk pursuant to the provisions of subsection (f) of this section. The unit of local government shall deposit notice in the U.S. mail at least 30 days prior to the displacement issues being placed on the agenda for discussion or action at an official meeting of the governing body of the unit of local government.

Following the public notice required by subsection (b) of this section, but in no event later than six months after the date of the first meeting pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the unit of local government may proceed to take formal action to displace a private company. The unit of local government or other public or private entity selected by the unit of local government may not commence the actual provision of these services for a period of 15 months from the date of the first publication of notice, unless the unit of local government provides compensation to the displaced private company as follows:

Subject to subdivision (3) of this subsection, if the private company has provided collection services in the displacement area prior to announcement of the displacement action, the unit of local government shall provide compensation to the displaced private company in an amount equal to the total gross revenues for collection services provided in the displacement area for the six months prior to the first publication of notice required under subsection (b) of this section.

Subject to subdivision (3) of this subsection, if the displaced private company has provided collection services in the displacement area for less than six months prior to the first publication of notice required under subsection (b) of this section, the unit of local government shall provide compensation to the displaced private company in an amount equal to the total gross revenues for the period of time that the private company provided such services in the displacement area.

If the displaced private company purchased an existing operation of another private company providing such services, compensation shall be for six months based on the monthly average total gross revenues for three months the immediate preceding the first publication of notice required under subsection (b) of this section.

If the local government elects to provide compensation pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the amount due from the unit of local government to the displaced company shall be paid as follows: one-third of the compensation to be paid within 30 days of the displacement and the balance paid in six equal monthly installments during the next succeeding six months.

If the unit of local government fails to change the provision of solid waste services as described in the notices required under subsection (b) of this section within six months of the date of the first meeting pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the unit of local government shall not take action to displace without complying again with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.

Notice of the provision of solid waste collection service shall be filed with the unit of local government clerk of all cities and counties located in the private company’s collection area or within five miles thereof.

This section shall not apply when a private company is displaced as the result of an annexation under Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or an annexation by an act of the General Assembly. The provisions of G.S. 160A-37.3, 160-49.3, or 160A-324 shall apply.

If a unit of local government intends to provide compensation under subsection (c) of this section to a private company that has given notice under subsection (f) of this section, the private company shall make available to the unit of local government not later than 30 days following a written request of the unit of local government, sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, all information in its possession or control, including operational, financial, and budgetary information necessary for the unit of local government to determine if the private company qualifies for compensation. The private company forfeits its rights under this section if it fails to make a good faith response within 30 days following receipt of the written request for information from the unit of local government provided that the unit of local government’s written request so states by specific reference to this section.

Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of a city or county to establish recycling service where recycling service is not currently being offered.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

Collection. — The gathering of municipal solid waste, recovered materials, or recyclables from residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or institutional customers and transporting it to a sanitary landfill or other disposal facility. Collection does not include transport from a transfer station or processing point to a disposal facility.

Displacement. — Any formal action by a unit of local government that prohibits a private company from providing all or a portion of the collection services for municipal solid waste, recovered materials, or recyclables that the company is providing in the affected area at least 90 days prior to the date of the first publication of notice required by subsection (b) of this section. Displacement also means an action by a unit of local government to use an availability fee, nonoptional fee, or taxes to fund competing collection services for municipal solid waste, recovered materials, or recyclables that the private company is providing in the affected areas at least 90 days prior to the date of the first publication of notice required under subsection (b) of this section is given. Displacement does not include any of the following actions:

Failure to renew a franchise agreement or contract with a private company.

Taking action that results in a change in solid waste collection services because the private company’s operations present an imminent and substantial threat to human health or safety or are causing a substantial public nuisance.

Taking action that results in a change in solid waste collection services because the private company has materially breached its franchise agreement or the terms of a contract with the local government, or the company has notified the local government that it no longer intends to honor the terms of the franchise agreement or contract. Notice of breach must be delivered in writing, delivered by certified mail to the firm in question with 30 days to cure the violation of the contract.

Terminating an existing contract or franchise in accordance with the provisions of the contract or franchise agreement.

Providing temporary collection services under a declared state of emergency.

Taking action that results in a change in solid waste collection services due to the existing providers’ felony conviction of a violation in the State of federal or State law governing the solid waste collection or disposal.

Contracting with a private company to continue its existing services or provide a different level of service at a negotiated price on terms agreeable to the parties.

Municipal solid waste. — As defined in G.S. 130A-290(18a).

Unit of local government. — A county, municipality, authority, or political subdivision that is authorized by law to provide for collection of solid waste or recovered materials, or both.

History.

2006-193, s. 4.

§ 160A-328.
Local government landfill liaison.

A city that has planning jurisdiction over any portion of the site of a sanitary landfill may employ a local government landfill liaison. No person who is responsible for any aspect of the management or operation of the landfill may serve as a local government landfill liaison. A local government landfill liaison shall have a right to enter public or private lands on which the landfill facility is located at reasonable times to inspect the landfill operation in order to:

Ensure that the facility meets all local requirements.

Identify and notify the Department of suspected violations of applicable federal or State laws, regulations, or rules.

Identify and notify the Department of potentially hazardous conditions at the facility.

Entry pursuant to this section shall not constitute a trespass or taking of property.

History.

2007-550, s. 11(b).

§ 160A-329.
Provision of municipal services to certain properties.

A municipality shall provide municipal services as defined under subsection (b) of this section to any property if that property owner submitted a petition for voluntary annexation under Article 4A of this Chapter, and the municipal governing board voted on an annexation ordinance for that property but the annexation ordinance failed of adoption. This section applies if the property owner (i) submits to the governing board a notice exercising the provisions of this section within 60 days of this section becoming law and (ii) agrees in writing to all the requirements contained in any utility extension agreement that was presented to the governing board at the same meeting as the annexation that failed of adoption. The municipal governing board may not impose more burdensome requirements or commitments on the property owner that are inconsistent with the requirements and commitments that are contained in the utility extension agreement.

For purposes of this section, prior to the effective date of the annexation of the property, the term “municipal services” only means water and sewer services, but only if the municipality has water and sewer capacity. For purposes of this section, prior to or after the effective date of annexation into a municipality, for any property subject to a declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions of a subdivision that permits an association to enter into agreement with utility providers prior to July 1, 2014, “municipal services” includes water service but not sewer service despite any language to the contrary in an executed and recorded utility extension agreement. For purposes of this section, prior to the effective date of annexation, the term “municipal services” specifically does not include any of the following services of the municipality: police protection, fire protection, solid waste services, or street maintenance services.

Requirements and commitments contained in the utility extension agreement that was presented to the governing board at the same meeting as the annexation ordinance that failed of adoption shall continue as obligations of the agreement unless the city council relieves the property owner of the requirement or commitment. Those requirements and commitments include, but are not limited to, the committed elements of a development plan in a zoning map case approved by the county where the property is located.

History.

2013-386, s. 1; 2014-47, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-47, s. 2, effective June 30, 2014, in subsection (b), substituted “and” for “or” twice in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 160A-330.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Electric Service in Urban Areas.

§ 160A-331.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings indicated when used in this Part:

“Assigned area” means any portion of an area annexed to or incorporated into a city which, on or before the effective date of annexation or incorporation, had been assigned by the North Carolina Utilities Commission to a specific electric supplier pursuant to

G.S. 62-110.2

.

(1a)

“Assigned supplier” means a person, firm, or corporation to which the North Carolina Utilities Commission had assigned a specific area for service as an electric supplier pursuant to

G.S. 62-110.2

, which area, in whole or in part, is subsequently annexed to or incorporated into a city.

(1b)

The “determination date” is

April 20, 1965, with respect to areas within the corporate limits of any city as of April 20, 1965;

The effective date of annexation with respect to areas annexed to any city after April 20, 1965;

The date a primary supplier comes into being with respect to any city first incorporated after April 20, 1965.

“Line” means any conductor located inside the city, or any conductor within 300 feet of areas annexed by the city that is a primary supplier, for distributing or transmitting electricity, except as follows:

For overhead construction, a conductor from the pole nearest the premises of a consumer to such premises, or a conductor from a line tap to such premises.

For underground construction, a conductor from the transformer (or the junction point, if there be one) nearest the premises of a consumer to such premises.

“Premises” means the building, structure, or facility to which electricity is being or is to be furnished. Two or more buildings, structures, or facilities that are located on one tract or contiguous tracts of land and are used by one electric consumer for commercial, industrial, institutional, or governmental purposes, shall together constitute one “premises,” except that any such building, structure, or facility shall not, together with any other building, structure, or facility, constitute one “premises” if the electric service to it is separately metered and the charges for such service are calculated independently of charges for service to any other building, structure, or facility.

“Primary supplier” means a city that owns and maintains its own electric system, or a person, firm, or corporation that furnishes electric service within a city pursuant to a franchise granted by, or contract with, a city, or that, having furnished service pursuant to a franchise or contract, is continuing to furnish service within a city after the expiration of the franchise or contract.

“Secondary supplier” means a person, firm, or corporation that is not a primary supplier, but that furnishes electricity at retail to one or more consumers other than itself within the limits of a city, or that has a conductor located within 300 feet of an area annexed by a city that is a primary supplier. A primary supplier that furnishes electric service within a city pursuant to a franchise or contract that limits or restricts the classes of consumers or types of electric service permitted to such supplier shall, in and with respect to any area annexed by the city after April 20, 1965, be a primary supplier for such classes of consumers or types of service, and if it furnishes other electric service in the annexed area on the effective date of annexation, shall be a secondary supplier, in and with respect to such annexed area, for all other electric service. A primary supplier that continues to furnish electric service after the expiration of a franchise or contract that limited or restricted such primary supplier with respect to classes of consumers or types of electric service shall, in and with respect to any area annexed by the city after April 20, 1965, be a secondary supplier for all electric service if it is furnishing electric service in the annexed area on the effective date of annexation.

History.

1965, c. 287, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 52; 1997-346, s. 1; 1999-111, s. 1; 2003-24, s. 1; 2005-150, s. 2.

§ 160A-331.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-419, s. 3, effective August 21, 2007.

§ 160A-331.2.
Agreements of electric suppliers.

The General Assembly finds and determines that, in order to avoid the unnecessary duplication of electric facilities and to facilitate the settlement of disputes between cities that are primary suppliers and other electric suppliers, it is desirable for the State to authorize electric suppliers to enter into agreements pursuant to which the parties to the agreements allocate to each other the right to provide electric service to premises each would not have the right to serve under this Article but for the agreement, provided that no agreement between a city that is a primary supplier and another electric supplier shall be enforceable by or against an electric supplier that is subject to the territorial assignment jurisdiction of the North Carolina Utilities Commission until the agreement has been approved by the Commission. The Commission shall approve an agreement entered into pursuant to this section unless it finds that such agreement is not in the public interest. Such agreements may allocate the right to serve premises by reference to specific premises, geographical boundaries, or amounts of unspecified load to be served, but no agreement shall affect in any way the rights of other electric suppliers who are not parties to the relevant agreement. The provisions of this section apply to agreements relating to electric service inside and outside the corporate limits of a city.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-419, s. 1, effective August 21, 2007.

To the extent negotiations undertaken pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, as enacted by S.L. 2005-150, have not resulted in an agreement between a negotiating electric membership corporation and a negotiating city by May 31, 2007, jurisdiction shall immediately lie in the North Carolina Utilities Commission to resolve all issues related to those negotiations. Either party to the negotiations may petition the Commission to exercise the jurisdiction conferred in this subsection upon the filing of a petition and the payment of a filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00). In reaching its decision, the Commission shall include consideration of the public convenience and necessity. The Commission shall not consider rate differentials between the involved city and the involved electric membership corporation.

Notwithstanding an order of the Commission issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section:

Any electric membership corporation or city may furnish electric service to any consumer who desires service from that electric membership corporation or city at any premises being served by another electric membership corporation or city, or at premises which another electric membership corporation or city has the right to serve pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, upon agreement of the affected electric membership corporation or city, subject to approval by the Commission.

The Commission shall have the authority and jurisdiction, after notice to all affected electric membership corporations and cities and after a hearing, if a hearing is requested by any affected electric membership corporation or city, or any other interested party, to order any electric membership corporation or city which may reasonably do so to furnish electric service to any consumer who desires service from that electric membership corporation or city at any premises being served by another electric membership corporation or city pursuant to subsection (c) of this section or subdivision (1) of this subsection, or which another electric membership corporation or city has the right to serve pursuant to subsection (c) of this section or subdivision (1) of this subsection, and to order the other electric membership corporation or city to cease and desist from furnishing electric service to such premises, upon finding that service to the consumer by the electric membership corporation or city which is then furnishing service, or which has the right to furnish service to those premises, is or will be inadequate or undependable, or that the rates, conditions of service, or service regulations, applied to such consumer, are unreasonably discriminatory.

Assignments or reassignments made or approved by the Commission pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) of this section shall be deemed to be service area agreements approved pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

2005-150, s. 3; 2007-419, s. 1.